Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska39-2604
Permit; issuance; fees; disposition.

The department may issue permits for the location and operation of junkyards within the limits prescribed in section 39-2603. If the applicant is an individual, the application for a permit shall include the applicant's social security number. The department shall charge an annual permit fee to be paid to the department in the manner provided by the department and shall thereafter be paid into the Highway Cash Fund and shall, by order, adjust the annual fees to cover the costs of administering the provisions of sections 39-2601 to 39-2612.

Laws 1971, LB 398, § 4;

Laws 1995, LB 264, § 27;

Laws 1997, LB 752, § 95.